Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3,155
Workers' compensation insurance; plan of operation.

An association shall adopt and maintain a plan of operation that includes the methods for administering insurance policies obtained pursuant to section 44-3,151, including the payment of premiums, the distribution of discounts, and the methods for providing risk management.

Laws 1996, LB 515, § 5.